North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 14F. Savings Accounts.

§ 54-109.53.
Shares.

The capital of a credit union consists of the payments made by members on shares, undivided surplus, and reserves.

Shares may be subscribed to, paid for and transferred in such manner as the bylaws prescribe.

A certificate need not be issued to denote ownership of a share in a credit union.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 13; C.S., s. 5226; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, ss. 16, 17; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.54.
Dividends.

The board of directors of any credit union may declare dividends as its bylaws provide.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 22; C.S., s. 5223; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1957, c. 989, s. 3; 1965, c. 956, s. 15; 1969, c. 69, ss. 3, 4; 1973, c. 199, s. 7; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1983, c. 568, s. 3.

§ 54-109.55.
Deposits.

A credit union may receive on deposit the savings of its members and also nonmembers in such amounts and upon such terms as the board of directors may determine and the bylaws shall provide.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 16; C.S., s. 5217; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.56.
Thrift accounts.

Christmas clubs, vacation clubs, and other thrift accounts may be operated under conditions established by the board of directors.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.57.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-236, s. 4, effective October 1, 2011.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 14; C.S., s. 5227; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1078, s. 2; 1989, c. 164, s. 6; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 866, s. 8; 2001-267, s. 2; 2001-487, s. 61(a); 2012-168, s. 4; 2012-194, s. 63; repealed by 2011-236, s. 4, effective October 1, 2011.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions relating to Payable on Death (POD) accounts, see

G.S. 54-109.57

A.

§ 54-109.57A.
Payable on Death (POD) accounts.

Shares may be issued to and deposits received from any natural person or natural persons establishing an account who shall execute a written agreement with the credit union containing a statement that it is executed pursuant to the provisions of this section and providing for the account to be held in the name of the natural person or natural persons as owner or owners for one or more beneficiaries. Such account and any balance thereof shall be held as a Payable on Death account. The account shall have the following incidents:

Any owner during the owner’s lifetime may change any designated beneficiary by a written direction to the credit union.

If there are two or more owners of a Payable on Death account, the owners shall own the account as joint tenants with right of survivorship and, except as otherwise provided in this section, the account shall have the incidents set forth in

G.S. 54-109.58

.

Any owner may withdraw funds by writing checks or otherwise, as set forth in the account contract, and receive payment in cash or check payable to the owner’s personal order.

If the beneficiary or beneficiaries are natural persons, there may be one or more beneficiaries and the following shall apply:

If only one beneficiary is living and of legal age at the death of the last surviving owner, the beneficiary shall be the owner of the account, and payment by the credit union to such owner shall be a total discharge of the credit union’s obligation as to the amount paid. If two or more beneficiaries are living at the death of the last surviving owner, they shall be owners of the account as joint tenants with right of survivorship as provided in

G.S. 54-109.58

, and payment by the credit union to the owners or any of the owners shall be a total discharge of the credit union’s obligation as to the amount paid.

If only one beneficiary is living and that beneficiary is not of legal age at the death of the last surviving owner, the credit union shall transfer the funds in the account to the general guardian or guardian of the estate, if any, of the minor beneficiary. If no guardian of the minor beneficiary has been appointed, the credit union shall hold the funds in a similar interest bearing account in the name of the minor until the minor reaches the age of majority or until a duly appointed guardian withdraws the funds.

If the beneficiary is an entity other than a natural person, there shall be only one beneficiary.

If one or more owners survive the last surviving beneficiary who was a natural person, or if a beneficiary who is an entity other than a natural person should cease to exist before the death of the owner, the account shall become an individual account of the owner, or a joint account with right of survivorship of the owners, and shall have the legal incidents of an individual account in a case of a single owner or a joint account with right of survivorship, as provided in G.S. 54-109.58, in the case of multiple owners.

Prior to the death of the last surviving owner, no beneficiary shall have any ownership interest in a Payable on Death account. Funds in a Payable on Death account established pursuant to this subsection shall belong to the beneficiary or beneficiaries upon the death of the last surviving owner, and the funds shall be subject only to the personal representative’s right of collection as set forth in G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(1). Payment by the credit union of funds in the Payable on Death account to the beneficiary or beneficiaries shall terminate the personal representative’s authority under G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(1) to collect against the credit union for the funds so paid, but the personal representative’s authority to collect such funds from the beneficiary or beneficiaries is not terminated.

A pledge of a Payable on Death account by any owner, unless otherwise specifically agreed between the credit union and all owners in writing, is a valid pledge and transfer of the account or of the pledged amount, is binding upon all owners and beneficiaries, does not operate to sever or terminate the joint ownership of all or any part of the account, and survives the death of any owner or any beneficiary.The natural person or natural persons establishing an account under this subsection shall sign a statement containing language set forth in a conspicuous manner and substantially similar to the language set out below; the language may be on a signature card or in an explanation of the account that is set out in a separate document whose receipt is acknowledged by the person or persons establishing the account:

Click to view

This section shall not be deemed exclusive. Deposit accounts not conforming to this section shall be governed by other applicable provisions of the General Statutes or the common law, as appropriate.

No addition to such accounts, nor any withdrawal, payment, or change of beneficiary, shall affect the nature of such accounts as Payable on Death accounts or affect the right of any owner to terminate the account.

This section does not repeal or modify any provisions of laws relating to estate taxes.

Any payable on death account created under the provisions of

G.S. 54-109.57

, as it existed prior to October 1, 2011, shall for all purposes be governed by the provisions of this section on and after October 1, 2011, and any reference to

G.S. 54-109.57

in any document concerning the account shall be deemed a reference to this section.

“CREDIT UNION (or name of institution) PAYABLE ON DEATH ACCOUNT

G.S. 54-109.57

A I (or we) understand that by establishing a Payable on Death account under the provisions of that: North Carolina General Statute 54-109.57A 1. During my (or our) lifetime I (or we), individually or jointly, may withdraw the money in the account. 2. By written direction to the credit union (or name of institution) I (or we), individually or jointly, may change the beneficiary or beneficiaries. 3. Upon my (or our) death the money remaining in the account will belong to the beneficiary or beneficiaries, and the money will not be inherited by my (or our) heirs or be controlled by will. ”

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 14; C.S., s. 5227; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1078, s. 2; 1989, c. 164, s. 6; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 866, s. 8; 2001-267, s. 2; 2001-487, s. 61(a); 2011-236, s. 4; 2012-168, s. 4; 2012-194, s. 63; 2013-132, s. 1; 2017-165, s. 14.

§ 54-109.58.
Joint accounts.

Shares may be issued to and deposits received from any two or more persons opening or holding an account or accounts, but no joint tenant, unless a member in his own right, shall be permitted to vote, obtain loans, or hold office or be required to pay an entrance or membership fee. The account and any balance thereof shall be held by them as joint tenants, with or without right of survivorship, as the contract shall provide; the account may also be held pursuant to

G.S. 41-2.1

and have the incidents set forth in that section, provided, however, if the account is held pursuant to

G.S. 41-2.1

the contract shall set forth that fact as well.

Unless the persons establishing the account have agreed with the credit union that withdrawals require more than one signature, payment by the credit union to, or on the order of, any persons holding an account authorized by this section shall be a total discharge of the credit union’s obligations as to the amount so paid.

Funds in a joint account established with right of survivorship shall belong to the surviving joint tenant or tenants upon the death of a joint tenant, and the funds shall be subject only to the personal representative’s right of collection as set forth in G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(3), or as provided in

G.S. 41-2.1

if the account is established pursuant to the provisions of that section. Payment by the credit union of funds in the joint account to a surviving joint tenant or tenants shall terminate the personal representative’s authority under G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(3) to collect against the credit union for the funds so paid, but the personal representative’s authority to collect such funds from the surviving joint tenant or tenants is not terminated.

A pledge of a joint account by any one or more of the joint tenants, unless otherwise specifically agreed between the credit union and all joint tenants in writing, shall be a valid pledge and transfer of the account or of the amount so pledged, shall be binding upon all joint tenants, shall not operate to sever or terminate the joint ownership of all or any part of the account, and shall survive the death of any joint tenant.

A credit union is not liable to joint tenants for complying in good faith with a writ of execution, garnishment, attachment, levy, or other legal process that appears to have been issued by a court or other authority of competent jurisdiction and seeks funds held in the name of any one or more of the joint tenants.

Persons establishing an account under this section shall sign a statement showing their election of the right of survivorship in the account, and containing language set forth in a conspicuous manner and substantially similar to the following:

Click to view

The language may be on a signature card or in an explanation of the account that is set out in a separate document whose receipt is acknowledged by the person or persons establishing the account.

Any joint tenant may terminate a joint account.

Where a joint account is held by two or more individuals and a joint tenant does not wish for the account to be terminated but requests to be removed from the account, the credit union shall remove the joint tenant from the account. The joint account shall continue in the names of the remaining tenant or tenants. Any joint tenant who requested to be removed from an account remains liable for any debts incurred in connection with the joint account during the period in which the individual was a named joint tenant.

This section shall not be deemed exclusive. Deposit accounts not conforming to this section shall be governed by other applicable provisions of the General Statutes or the common law as appropriate.

This section does not repeal or modify any provisions of laws relating to estate taxes. This section regulates and protects the credit union in its relationship with joint owners of accounts.

No addition to such account, nor any withdrawal or payment shall affect the nature of the account as a joint account, or affect the right of any tenant to terminate the account.

‘‘CREDIT UNION (or name of institution) JOINT ACCOUNT WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP

G.S. 54-109.58

We understand that by establishing a joint account under the provisions of that: North Carolina General Statute 54-109.58 1. The credit union (or name of institution) may pay the money in the account to, or on the order of, any person named in the account unless we have agreed with the credit union that withdrawals require more than one signature; and 2. Upon the death of one joint owner the money remaining in the account will belong to the surviving joint owners and will not pass by inheritance to the heirs of the deceased joint owner or be controlled by the deceased joint owner’s will. We DO elect to create the right of survivorship in this account. ”

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1078, s. 3; 1989, c. 164, s. 3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 866, s. 7; 1998-69, s. 15; 2013-132, s. 2; 2014-61, s. 1.

§ 54-109.59.
Liens.

The credit union shall have a lien on the shares, deposits and accumulated dividends or interest of a member in his individual, joint or trust account, for any sum past due the credit union from said member or for any loan endorsed by him.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 13; C.S., s. 5226; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, ss. 16, 17; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.60.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 559, s. 6.

§ 54-109.60A.
Minors.

A credit union may issue and operate a share or deposit account in the name of (i) a minor or (ii) the names of two or more individuals, one or more of which are minors. A minor who obtains a share or deposit account from a credit union under this subsection, whether individually or together with others, is bound by the terms of the account agreement to the same extent as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity.

If a minor with a share account, other than a joint account with right of survivorship or a payable on death account, dies, a parent or legal guardian of the minor may access and withdraw the funds on deposit, and the credit union is discharged to the extent of any withdrawal.

This section shall not affect the law governing transactions with minors in cases outside the scope of this section, including transactions that constitute an extension of credit to a minor.

History.

2013-132, s. 3.

§ 54-109.60B.
Accounts opened by adults for minors.

One or more adults may open and maintain a custodial share account for or in the name of a minor and using the minor’s taxpayer identification number. Unless otherwise provided in the agreement governing the account, the following terms apply:

Beneficial ownership of the account vests exclusively in the minor. All interest credited to the account shall belong to the minor and shall be reported to the appropriate taxing authorities in the name of the minor using the minor’s taxpayer identification number.

Except as otherwise provided, control of the account vests exclusively in the custodian whose name appears on the credit union’s records for the account. If there is more than one custodian named on the credit union’s account records, each may act independently. Any one or more of the custodians named on the credit union’s records may turn over control of the account to the minor at any time, either before or after the minor reaches the age of majority.

If the custodian has not already transferred control, then after the minor beneficiary reaches the age of majority, the beneficiary may instruct the credit union to transfer control to the beneficiary and remove the named custodian.

If the custodian or, if more than one custodian is on the account, the last of the custodians to survive dies before the minor reaches the age of majority, the minor’s parent or the minor’s legal guardian may act as custodian or name another custodian on the account.

This section shall not be deemed exclusive. Accounts not conforming to this section shall be governed by other applicable provisions of the General Statutes, including Chapter 33A, the North Carolina Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, or the common law, as appropriate.

History.

2013-132, s. 3.

§ 54-109.61.
Reduction in shares.

Whenever the losses of any credit union, resulting from a depreciation in value of its loans or investments or otherwise, exceed its undivided earnings and reserve fund so that the estimated value of its assets is less than the total amount due the shareholders, the credit union may by a majority vote of the members present at a special meeting called for that purpose order a reduction in the shares of each of its shareholders to divide the loss proportionately among the members.

If the credit union thereafter realizes from such assets a greater amount than was fixed by the order of reduction, such excess shall be divided proportionately among the shareholders whose assets were reduced, but only to the extent of such reduction.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.62.
Payment of balance of deceased person or person under disability to personal representative or guardian.

A credit union may pay any balance on deposit to the credit of any deceased individual to the duly qualified personal representative, collector, or public administrator of the decedent who is qualified as such under the laws of any state.

A credit union may pay any balance on deposit to the credit of any individual judicially declared incompetent or otherwise under a legal disability to the duly qualified personal representative, guardian, curator, conservator, or committee of the person declared incompetent or under disability who is qualified as such under the laws of any state.

The presentation of a letter of qualification as personal representative, collector, public administrator, guardian, curator, conservator, or committee of the person issued or certified by the appointing court shall be conclusive proof of the jurisdiction of the court issuing the same and sufficient authority for the payment.

Payment by a credit union in good faith under the authority of this section discharges the liability of the bank to the extent of the payment.

History.

2013-132, s. 3.

§ 54-109.62A.
Powers of attorney; notice of revocation; payment after notice.

Any credit union may continue to recognize any act of an attorney-in-fact or other agent until the credit union receives actual notice of the principal’s death or a written notice of revocation signed by the principal who granted the authority or, in the case of a company, evidence satisfactory to the credit union of the revocation. Payment by the credit union to or at the direction of an attorney-in-fact or other agent before receipt of the notice is a total discharge of the credit union’s obligation as to the amount so paid.

Notwithstanding that a credit union has received written notice of revocation of the authority of an attorney-in-fact or other designated agent, a credit union may, until 10 days after receipt of notice, pay any item made, drawn, accepted, or endorsed by the attorney-in-fact or agent prior to the revocation, provided that the item is otherwise properly payable.

History.

2013-132, s. 3.

§ 54-109.63.
Personal agency accounts.

A person may open a personal agency account by written contract containing a statement that it is executed pursuant to the provisions of this section. A personal agency account may be a checking account, savings account, time deposit, or any other type of withdrawable account or certificate. The written contract shall name an agent who shall have authority to act on behalf of the depositor in regard to the account as set out in this subsection. The agent shall have the authority to:

Make, sign or execute checks drawn on the account or otherwise make withdrawals from the account;

Endorse checks made payable to the principal for deposit only into the account; and

Deposit cash or negotiable instruments, including instruments endorsed by the principal, into the account.

A person establishing an account under this section shall sign a statement containing language substantially similar to the following in a conspicuous manner:

Click to view

The language may be on a signature card or in an explanation of the account that is set out in a separate document whose receipt is acknowledged by the person or persons establishing the account.

An account created under the provisions of this section grants no ownership right or interest in the agent. Upon the death of the principal there is no right of survivorship to the account and the authority set out in subsection (a) terminates.

The written contract referred to in subsection (a) shall provide that the principal may elect to extend the authority of the agent set out in subsection (a) to act on behalf of the principal in regard to the account notwithstanding the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal. If the principal so elects to extend such authority of the agent, then upon the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal, the agent may continue to exercise such authority, without the requirement of bond or of accounting to any court, until such time as the agent shall receive actual knowledge that such authority has been terminated by a duly qualified guardian of the estate of the incapacitated or incompetent principal or by the duly appointed attorney-in-fact for the incapacitated or incompetent principal, acting pursuant to a durable power of attorney (as defined in

G.S. 32A-8

[now

G.S. 32C-1-102

]) which grants to the attorney-in-fact that authority in regard to the account which is granted to the agent by the written contract executed pursuant to the provisions of this section, at which time the agent shall account to such guardian or attorney-in-fact for all actions of the agent in regard to the account during the incapacity or incompetence of the principal. If the principal does not so elect to extend the authority of the agent, then upon the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal, the authority or the agent set out in subsection (a) terminates.

When an account under this section has been established all or part of the account or any interest or dividend thereon may be paid by the credit union on a check made, signed or executed by the agent. In the absence of actual knowledge that the principal has died or that the agency created by the account has been terminated, such payment shall be a valid and sufficient discharge to the credit union for payment so made.

An account established under the provisions of this section does not grant to the agent the authority to vote, obtain loans, or hold office and the agent shall not be required to pay an entrance or membership fee.

‘‘CREDIT UNION (or name of institution) PERSONAL AGENCY ACCOUNT

G.S. 54-109.63

I understand that by establishing a personal agency account under the provisions of that the agent named in the account may: North Carolina General Statute 54-109.63 1. Sign checks drawn on the account; and 2. Make deposits into the account. I also understand that upon my death the money remaining in the account will be controlled by my will or inherited by my heirs. ”

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1078, s. 4; 1989, c. 164, s. 9; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 866, s. 9; 2013-132, s. 4.

§ 54-109.64.
Savings promotion raffles.

A credit union may offer a savings promotion raffle in which the sole consideration required for a chance of winning designated prizes is the deposit of a minimum specified amount of money in a savings account or other savings program offered by the credit union. A credit union shall maintain records sufficient to facilitate an audit of the savings promotion raffle, shall conduct the savings promotion raffle in a safe and sound manner, and shall fully disclose the terms and conditions of the promotion to account holders and prospective account holders of the credit union.

History.

2011, c. 146, s. 2.